Maryland, session 2026, HB0315.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Government
20–701.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(c) “Discriminatory housing practice” means an act that is prohibited under §
20–705, § 20–705.1, § 20–706, § 20–707, or § 20–708 of this subtitle.
20–705.1.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION, “INCOME–BASED HOUSING SUBSIDY” MEANS
RECURRING MONETARY ASSISTANCE TO A LANDLORD FROM A GOVERNMENTAL
ENTITY OR NONPROFIT ORGANIZATION THAT IS INTENDED TO DEFRAY, IN WHOLE
OR IN PART, A TENANT’S RENT OBLIGATION.
(2) “INCOME–BASED HOUSING SUBSIDY” INCLUDES LOW–INCOME
HOUSING ASSISTANCE CERTIFICATES AND VOUCHERS ISSUED UNDER THE UNITED
STATES HOUSING ACT OF 1937.
(B) EXCEPT AS AUTHORIZED UNDER FEDERAL LAW, A LANDLORD OR
RESIDENTIAL RENTAL PROPERTY THAT USES FINANCIAL INFORMATION, INCLUDING
CREDIT HISTORY, AS PART OF A PROSPECTIVE TENANT’S RENTAL APPLICATION MAY
NOT REFUSE TO RENT TO A PROSPECTIVE TENANT WHO PAYS RENT WITH THE
ASSISTANCE OF AN INCOME–BASED HOUSING SUBSIDY ON THE BASIS OF:
(1) THE PROSPECTIVE TENANT’S INCOME;
(2) THE PROSPECTIVE TENANT’S CREDIT SCORE OR LACK OF CREDIT
SCORE; OR
(3) ANY ADVERSE CREDIT HISTORY THAT AROSE DURING A PERIOD
WHEN THE PROSPECTIVE TENANT DID NOT HAVE AN INCOME–BASED HOUSING
SUBSIDY, IF THE LANDLORD COULD REASONABLY HAVE KNOWN THE DATE ON WHICH
THE SUBSIDY WAS RECEIVED THE PERIOD DURING WHICH THE TENANT DID NOT
HAVE THE SUBSIDY IS CONFIRMED BY:
(I) THE APPLICANT;

HOUSE BILL 315 3
(II) VOUCHER PAPERWORK;
(III) DOCUMENTS PROVIDED BY A PUBLIC HOUSING AUTHORITY;
OR
(IV) A PUBLIC HOUSING AUTHORITY IN RESPONSE TO A REQUEST
BY THE LANDLORD.
(C) NOTWITHSTANDING SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, A LANDLORD
MAY NOT REQUIRE THAT A PUBLIC HOUSING AUTHORITY VERIFY APPLICABLE DATES
FOR THE SUBSIDY FOR PURPOSES OF ASSESSING THE TENANT’S CREDIT HISTORY.
(C) (D) NOTWITHSTANDING SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, A
LANDLORD THAT RECEIVES FUNDING FROM A GOVERNMENTAL ENTITY, A
QUASI–GOVERNMENTAL ENTITY, OR A NONPROFIT ORGANIZATION THAT REQUIRES
INCOME QUALIFICATION FOR TENANTS IN INCOME–RESTRICTED RENTAL UNITS MAY
COLLECT FINANCIAL INFORMATION FROM A PROSPECTIVE TENANT IF THE
COLLECTION OF FINANCIAL INFORMATION IS A CONDITION OF THE FUNDING.
(E) NOTWITHSTANDING SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, A LANDLORD OR
RESIDENTIAL RENTAL PROPERTY MAY REQUIRE VERIFICATION THAT A TENANT HAS
SUFFICIENT INCOME TO PAY THE PORTION OF RENT NOT COVERED BY THE
INCOME–BASED HOUSING SUBSIDY USING AN INCOME TO TENANT’S PORTION OF
RENT RATIO THAT IS SUBSTANTIALLY EQUIVALENT TO THE RATIO USED BY THE
LANDLORD FOR NONSUBSIDIZED TENANTS.
(F) A LANDLORD OR RESIDENTIAL RENTAL PROPERTY MAY REFUSE TO
RENT TO A PROSPECTIVE TENANT WHO PAYS RENT WITH THE ASSISTANCE OF AN
INCOME–BASED HOUSING SUBSIDY ON THE BASIS OF ANY COMMERCIALLY
REASONABLE AND NONDISCRIMINATORY USE OF:
(1) A REFERENCE FROM A PREVIOUS OR CURRENT LANDLORD OF THE
TENANT; OR
(2) THE TENANT’S HISTORY OF VIOLATING A LEASE, CREATING A
NUISANCE, OR DAMAGING PROPERTY.
20–1020.
(a) In this part the following words have the meanings indicated.
(e) “Discriminatory housing practice” means an act that is prohibited under §
20–705, § 20–705.1, § 20–706, § 20–707, or § 20–708 of this title.

HOUSE BILL 315
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.